Tennessee, session 114, HB0636.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 7-84-711(a), is amended by deleting
subdivision (2) and substituting instead the following:
(2) Contemplate a capital cost for the development of the district of not less than
one million dollars ($1,000,000).
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0636
001045
- 1 -